Maine, session 132, LD136.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §994, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Tax expenditure evaluations. To direct the office to conduct tax expenditure
evaluations pursuant to the processes established in section 999;
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §998, as amended by PL 2023, c. 417, §§2 to 4, is further amended
to read:
§998. Process for review of tax expenditures
1. Assignment of review categories. By October 1, 2015, the The policy committee,
in consultation with the policy committee, shall assign each tax expenditure to one of the
following review categories:
A. Full evaluation for tax expenditures that are intended to provide an incentive for
specific behaviors, that provide a benefit to a specific group of beneficiaries or for
which measurable goals can be identified;
B. Expedited review for tax expenditures that are intended to implement broad tax
policy goals that cannot be reasonably measured; and
C. No review for tax expenditures with an impact on state revenue of less than $50,000
or that otherwise do not warrant either a full evaluation or expedited review.
2. Schedule. The policy committee, in consultation with the policy committee, shall
establish a prioritized schedule of ongoing review of the tax expenditures assigned to the
full evaluation and expedited review categories pursuant to subsection 1, paragraphs A and
B. To the extent practicable, the policy committee shall group the review of tax
expenditures with similar goals together. Beginning in 2024, when When prioritizing
ongoing review of tax expenditures assigned to the full evaluation category, the policy
committee, in consultation with the policy committee, shall give priority to tax
expenditures that are intended to provide an incentive to businesses over tax expenditures
that are directed primarily toward individual tax relief and shall consider the impact of any
statutory provisions regarding the expiration of a tax expenditure that may be the subject
of legislation to extend the tax expenditure.
3. Annual review of assignments and schedule. By October 1st of each year,
beginning in 2016, the policy committee, in consultation with the policy committee, shall
review and make any necessary adjustments to the review category assignments and
schedule pursuant to subsections 1 and 2, including adjustments needed to incorporate tax
expenditures enacted, amended or repealed during the preceding year.
4. Office responsibilities. The office shall maintain a current record of the review
category assignments and the schedule under this section.
5. Policy committee meetings. In order to perform its functions under this chapter,
the policy committee may meet monthly or as often as is determined necessary by the chairs
of the policy committee.
6. Limited analysis projects. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, the policy committee may request the committee to approve up to 2 limited
analysis projects related to legislation before the policy committee to be completed by the
office during each regular legislative session. For the purposes of this section subsection,
Page 1 - 132LR0583(01)

413 "limited analysis project" means a limited review of a tax expenditure based on information
424 readily available to the office that is intended to be completed and submitted to the
435 committee and the policy committee within 30 days of approval by the committee
446 following a request by the policy committee.
Sec. 3. 3 MRSA §999, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2017, c. 266, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Evaluation process. Beginning January 1, 2016, the The office shall evaluate each
tax expenditure identified under section 998, subsection 1, paragraph A in accordance with
the schedule established in section 998, subsection 2.
A. Prior to the beginning of each evaluation, the committee shall direct the office to
present recommendations to the policy committee. The policy committee, after
consideration of recommendations from the office, shall approve the following for each
tax expenditure subject to full evaluation:
(1) The purposes, intent or goals of the tax expenditure, as informed by original
legislative intent as well as subsequent legislative and policy developments and
changes in the state economy and fiscal condition;
(2) The intended beneficiaries of the tax expenditure;
(3) The evaluation objectives, which may include an assessment of:
(a) The fiscal impact of the tax expenditure, including past and estimated
future impacts;
(b) The extent to which the design of the tax expenditure is effective in
accomplishing the tax expenditure's purposes, intent or goals and consistent
with best practices;
(c) The extent to which the tax expenditure is achieving its purposes, intent or
goals, taking into consideration the economic context, market conditions and
indirect benefits;
(d) The extent to which those actually benefiting from the tax expenditure are
the intended beneficiaries;
(e) The extent to which it is likely that the desired behavior might have
occurred without the tax expenditure, taking into consideration similar tax
expenditures offered by other states;
(f) The extent to which the State's administration of the tax expenditure,
including enforcement efforts, is efficient and effective;
(g) The extent to which there are other state or federal tax expenditures, direct
expenditures or other programs that have similar purposes, intent or goals as
the tax expenditure, and the extent to which such similar initiatives are
coordinated, complementary or duplicative;
(h) The extent to which the tax expenditure is a cost-effective use of resources
compared to other options for using the same resources or addressing the same
purposes, intent or goals; and
(i) Any opportunities to improve the effectiveness of the tax expenditure in
meeting its purposes, intent or goals; and
Page 2 - 132LR0583(01)

(4) The performance measures appropriate for analyzing the evaluation objectives.
Performance measures must be clear and relevant to the specific tax expenditure
and the approved evaluation objectives.
B. Before final approval pursuant to paragraph A, the committee shall seek and
consider input from the policy committee and stakeholders and may seek input from
experts.
Sec. 4. 3 MRSA §1001, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 344, §4, is amended to
read:
2. Legislation. The policy committee may submit to the Legislature any legislation it
considers necessary to improve the process or availability of data for the review of tax
expenditures.